Wisconsin, session 2025, SB192.
do enact as follows:SB192,11Section 1. 48.396 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB192,3,21248.396 (1) Law enforcement officers’ records of children shall be kept separate 3from records of adults. Law enforcement officers’ records of the adult expectant 4mothers of unborn children shall be kept separate from records of other adults. Law 5enforcement officers’ records of children and the adult expectant mothers of unborn 6children shall not be open to inspection or their contents disclosed except under sub. 1(1b), (1d), (5), or (6) or s. 48.293 or, 250.22, or 938.396 (2m) (c) 1p. or by order of the 2court. This subsection does not apply to the representatives of newspapers or other 3reporters of news who wish to obtain information for the purpose of reporting news 4without revealing the identity of the child or adult expectant mother involved, to 5the confidential exchange of information between the police and officials of the 6public or private school attended by the child or other law enforcement or social 7welfare agencies, or to children 10 years of age or older who are subject to the 8jurisdiction of the court of criminal jurisdiction. A public school official who obtains 9information under this subsection shall keep the information confidential as 10required under s. 118.125, and a private school official who obtains information 11under this subsection shall keep the information confidential in the same manner 12as is required of a public school official under s. 118.125. This subsection does not 13apply to the confidential exchange of information between the police and officials of 14the tribal school attended by the child if the police determine that enforceable 15protections are provided by a tribal school policy or tribal law that requires tribal 16school officials to keep the information confidential in a manner at least as 17stringent as is required of a public school official under s. 118.125. A law 18enforcement agency that obtains information under this subsection shall keep the 19information confidential as required under this subsection and s. 938.396 (1) (a). A 20social welfare agency that obtains information under this subsection shall keep the 21information confidential as required under ss. 48.78 and 938.78.SB192,222Section 2. 48.396 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB192,4,62348.396 (2) (a) Records of the court assigned to exercise jurisdiction under this 1chapter and ch. 938 and of courts exercising jurisdiction under s. 48.16 shall be 2entered in books or deposited in files kept for that purpose only. Those records shall 3not be open to inspection or their contents disclosed except by order of the court 4assigned to exercise jurisdiction under this chapter and ch. 938 or as required or 5permitted under this subsection, sub. (3) (b) or (c) 1g., 1m., or 1r. or (6), or s. 48.375 6(7) (e) or 250.22.SB192,37Section 3. 48.78 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB192,4,13848.78 (2) (a) No agency may make available for inspection or disclose the 9contents of any record kept or information received about an individual who is or 10was in its care or legal custody, except as provided under sub. (2m) or s. 48.371, 1148.38 (5) (b) or (d) or (5m) (d), 48.396 (3) (bm) or (c) 1r., 48.432, 48.433, 48.48 (17) 12(bm), 48.57 (2m), 48.66 (6), 48.93, 48.981 (7), 250.22, 938.396 (2m) (c) 1r., 938.51, or 13938.78 or by order of the court.SB192,414Section 4. 48.981 (7) (a) 15. of the statutes is amended to read:SB192,4,181548.981 (7) (a) 15. A fatality review team established under s. 250.22, a child 16fatality review team recognized by the county department, or, in a county having a 17population of 750,000 or more, the department or a licensed child welfare agency 18under contract with the department.SB192,519Section 5. 51.30 (4) (b) 29. of the statutes is created to read:SB192,4,222051.30 (4) (b) 29. To an authorized member of a fatality review team 21established under s. 250.22. The recipient of any treatment records under this 22subdivision shall keep the records confidential in accordance with s. 250.22.SB192,623Section 6. 146.82 (2) (d) of the statutes is created to read:SB192,5,71146.82 (2) (d) Notwithstanding sub. (1), patient health care records may be 2released, upon request, to a fatality review team, as defined in s. 250.22 (1) (a), 3acting as a public health authority for the purpose of reviewing a death as described 4under s. 250.22. Records that may be released under this paragraph for the public 5health purposes under s. 250.22 may be disclosed to a fatality review team only in 6accordance with that section, and the recipient of any records released shall keep 7the records confidential.SB192,78Section 7. 250.22 of the statutes is created to read:SB192,5,99250.22 Fatality review teams. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB192,5,1210(a) “Fatality review team” means a multidisciplinary and multiagency team 11examining one or more types of reviewable death among children or adults and 12developing recommendations to prevent future deaths of similar circumstances.SB192,5,1613(b) “Local fatality review team” means a fatality review team that examines 14reviewable deaths from specific municipalities or counties. A “local fatality review 15team” may include a team formed by a collaboration of two or more municipalities, 16counties, local health departments, or tribal health departments.SB192,5,1717(c) “Municipality” means a city, village, or town.SB192,5,1918(d) “State fatality review team” means a fatality review team that examines 19reviewable deaths of residents across the state.SB192,5,2020(e) 1. “Reviewable death” includes any of the following types of deaths:SB192,5,2121a. Suicide.SB192,5,2322b. Homicide or death involving domestic violence, intimate partner violence, 23or homicide related to community violence.SB192,6,11c. Motor vehicle incident.SB192,6,22d. Overdose death.SB192,6,33e. Child abuse or neglect.SB192,6,44f. Stillbirth.SB192,6,55g. Fetal death or infant death.SB192,6,66h. A maternal death occurring during or within a year of a pregnancy.SB192,6,77i. Any unexpected or unintentional death of a child.SB192,6,982. “Reviewable death” does not include a death subject to review under s. 9175.47.SB192,6,1410(2) Department duties and authority. (a) The department shall establish 11a fatality review program comprised of local fatality review teams established at the 12option of a municipality, a county, a local health department, a tribal health 13department, or a combination of these entities. The department may also establish 14a state fatality review team.SB192,6,1715(b) In coordination with the department of justice, the department of children 16and families, or other state agencies, as appropriate, the department shall do all of 17the following: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb192 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb192 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB192 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB192 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB192: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting